Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1238.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2308(b.1) and 2322(a)(2) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.* * *(b.1) Additional exception.--[A semiautomatic rifle may be used to hunt game in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission.] A semiautomatic centerfire rifle that fires .223 caliber or larger ammunition may be used to hunt big game if the rifle is limited to a capacity of not more than three cartridges . * * *§ 2322. Prohibited devices and methods.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this 12345678910111213141516171819 title or commission regulation, no person shall hunt, kill or take or attempt, aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt, kill or take any big game, except wild turkey, with any of the following devices or methods:* * *(2) Any automatic or semiautomatic firearm, except [that any semiautomatic firearm modified to permit one shell in the chamber and no more than four shells in a magazine may be used by a person who suffered an amputation or lost the total use of one or both hands.] as follows:(i) A semiautomatic firearm may be used as provided under section 2308(b.1) (relating to unlawful devices and methods).(ii) A semiautomatic firearm may be used by a person who suffered an amputation or lost the total use of one or both hands if the firearm is modified to permit one shell in the chamber and no more than four shells in a magazine.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1238PN1515 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920